Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.005

Purpose.

Perpetuation of fish and wildlife in Washington requires clear, efficient, streamlined, scientific, management from a single state fish and wildlife agency. Such a consolidation will focus existing funds for the greatest protection of species and stocks. It will bring combined resources to bear on securing, managing, and enhancing habitats. It will simplify licensing, amplify research, increase field staff, avoid duplication, and magnify enforcement of laws and rules. It will provide all fishers, hunters, and observers of fish and wildlife with a single source of consistent policies, procedures, and access.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 1.]